District of Columbia statutes.
48-902.02

Nomenclature.

The controlled substances listed or to be listed in the schedules in §§ 48-902.04, 48-902.06, 48-902.08, 48-902.10 and 48-902.12 are included by whatever official, common, usual, chemical, or trade name designated.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 202, 28 DCR 3081
1981 Ed., § 33-512.